Florida, session 2026, SB1570.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âNotwithstanding the repeal of section 937.041, 15 Florida Statutes, in section 13 of chapter 2020-3, Laws of 16 Florida, section 937.041, Florida Statutes, is revived, 17 readopted, and amended to read: 18 937.041âMissing persons with special needs statewide 19 project.â 20 (1)âThere is created a statewide project, to be known as 21 âProject Leo,â through the centers a center for autism and 22 related disabilities established under s. 1004.55. Each center 23 that opts to join the project shall distribute personal devices 24 to aid search-and-rescue efforts for persons with special needs 25 in the case of elopement. 26 (2)âParticipants for the project shall be selected based on 27 criteria developed by the respective center for autism and 28 related disabilities based on the specific needs of the 29 respective each centerâs service area counties prescribed under 30 s. 1004.55. Criteria for participation in the project must 31 include, at a minimum, the personâs risk of elopement. The 32 qualifying participants shall be selected on a first-come, 33 first-served basis by the respective centers to the extent of 34 available funding within their existing resources. The project 35 must be voluntary and free of charge to participants. 36 (3)âUnder the project, personal devices to aid search-and 37 rescue efforts shall be provided by the respective center to the 38 sheriffâs offices of the participating counties. The devices 39 shall be distributed to project participants by the county 40 sheriffâs offices in conjunction with the respective center. The 41 respective center shall fund any costs associated with 42 monitoring the devices. 43 (4)âThe project shall operate to the extent of available 44 funding within the respective centerâs existing resources. 45 (5)âThis section expires June 30, 2019. 46 Section 2.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of 47 $250,000 in nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the General 48 Revenue Fund to the Center for Autism and Related Disabilities 49 at the University of Florida, the sum of $250,000 in 50 nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund 51 to the Center for Autism and Related Disabilities at Florida 52 Atlantic University, the sum of $250,000 in nonrecurring funds 53 is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Center for 54 Autism and Related Disabilities at the University of South 55 Florida, and the sum of $250,000 in nonrecurring funds is 56 appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Center for 57 Autism and Related Disabilities at Florida State University. The 58 funds provided to each center shall be used solely for the 59 purchase of personal devices to aid search-and-rescue efforts 60 for persons with special needs in the case of elopement. 61 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.